Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-539
Department of Health and Human Services;
Child Welfare Aid.

AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

Program No. 354 - Child Welfare Aid

FY2013-14
FY2014-15

GENERAL
FUND
156,756,327
136,264,457

CASH FUND
2,734,444
2,734,444

FEDERAL
FUND est.
30,763,503
30,106,037

PROGRAM
TOTAL
190,254,274
169,104,938

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2013-14
$156,756,327 General Funds, $2,734,444 Cash Funds, and $30,763,503 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2014-15 $136,264,457 General
Funds, $2,734,444 Cash Funds, and $30,106,037 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2013-14
$2,734,444 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for state aid
for the continuation of the behavioral health provider rate increase. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2014-15 $2,734,444
Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for state aid for the continuation
of the behavioral health provider rate increase.

Laws 2013, LB195, § 106;

Laws 2013, LB216A, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB561A, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB905, § 80.